Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202644-5137
Foreign securities.

(1) An insurer may invest in foreign securities or other investments (a) issued in, (b) located in, (c) denominated in the currency of, (d) whose ultimate payment amounts of principal or interest are subject to fluctuations in the currency of, or (e) whose obligors are domiciled in countries other than the United States or Canada, which are substantially of the same kinds and classes as those authorized for investment under the Insurers Investment Act. A security or investment shall not be deemed to be foreign if the issuer or a guarantor against which an insurer has a claim for payment has its principal place of business or is domiciled in the United States or Canada or the primary credit source is located in the United States or Canada and, in each case, the insurer has a contractual right to bring an enforcement action in the United States or Canada.

(2) Subject to the limitations in subsection (3) of this section:

(a) An insurer's investments authorized under subsection (1) of this section in any one foreign jurisdiction whose sovereign debt has a 1 designation from the Securities Valuation Office shall not exceed ten percent of the insurer's admitted assets;

(b) An insurer's investments authorized under subsection (1) of this section in any one foreign jurisdiction whose sovereign debt has a 2 or 3 designation from the Securities Valuation Office shall not exceed five percent of the insurer's admitted assets;

(c) An insurer's investments authorized under subsection (1) of this section in any one foreign jurisdiction whose sovereign debt has a 4, 5, or 6 designation from the Securities Valuation Office shall not exceed three percent of the insurer's admitted assets;

(d) An insurer's investments authorized under subsection (1) of this section denominated in any one foreign currency shall not exceed two percent of the insurer's admitted assets;

(e) An insurer's investments authorized under subsection (1) of this section denominated in foreign currencies, in the aggregate, shall not exceed five percent of the insurer's admitted assets; and

(f) An insurer's investments authorized under subsection (1) of this section shall not be considered denominated in a foreign currency if the acquiring insurer enters into one or more contracts in transactions permitted under section 44-5149 to exchange all payments made on the foreign currency denominated investments for United States currency at a rate which effectively insulates the investment cash flows against future changes in currency exchange rates during the period the contract or contracts are in effect.

(3) An insurer's investments authorized under subsection (1) of this section shall not exceed, in the aggregate, twenty-five percent of its admitted assets.

(4) An insurer which is authorized to do business in a foreign country or which has outstanding insurance, annuity, or reinsurance contracts on lives or risks resident or located in a foreign country may, in addition to the investments authorized by subsection (1) of this section, invest in securities and investments (a) issued in, (b) located in, (c) denominated in the currency of, (d) whose ultimate payment amounts of principal and interest are subject to fluctuations in the currency of, or (e) whose obligors are domiciled in such foreign countries, which are substantially of the same kinds and classes as those authorized for investment under the act.

(5) An insurer's investments authorized under subsection (4) of this section and cash in the currency of such country which is at any time held by such insurer, in the aggregate, shall not exceed the greater of (a) one and one-half times the amount of its reserves and other obligations under such contracts or (b) the amount which such insurer is required by law to invest in such country.

(6) Any investment in debt obligations authorized under this section shall have a minimum quality rating as described in subdivision (2) of section 44-5112, except that an insurer's investment in bonds or notes secured by a mortgage on real estate located outside of the United States or Canada that otherwise complies with section 44-5143 shall not be subject to such minimum quality rating requirements.

(7) An insurer's investments made under this section shall be aggregated with investments of the same kinds and classes made under the Insurers Investment Act except section 44-5153 for purposes of determining compliance with the limitations contained in other sections.

Laws 1991, LB 237, § 37;

Laws 1997, LB 273, § 18;

Laws 2007, LB117, § 16;

Laws 2022, LB863, § 30.